Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.050

Public officer making false certificate.

Every public officer who, being authorized by law to make or give a certificate or other writing, shall knowingly make and deliver as true such a certificate or writing containing any statement which he or she knows to be false, in a case where the punishment thereof is not expressly prescribed by law, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2012 c 117 s 115; 1909 c 249 s 128; RRS s 2380.]